Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 13. Mississippi Small Business Assistance Act.
§ 57-10-529.
Temporary borrowings by seller pending issuance of bonds of state.

Pending the issuance of bonds of the state as authorized under this article, the seller is hereby authorized in accordance with the provisions of this article and on the credit of the state, to make temporary borrowings not to exceed two (2) years in anticipation of the issue of bonds in order to provide funds in such amounts as may, from time to time, be deemed advisable prior to the issue of bonds. In order to provide for and in connection with such temporary borrowings, the seller is hereby authorized in the name and on behalf of the state to enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreement, or agreements, or other agreement or agreements with any financial institution or persons in the United States having power to enter into the same, which agreements may contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of this article as may be authorized by the seller.

All temporary borrowings made under this section shall be evidenced by notes of the state which shall be issued, from time to time, for such amounts not exceeding in the aggregate the applicable statutory and constitutional debt limitation, in such form and in such denominations and subject to terms and conditions of sale and issue, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of sale and time of payment of interest as the seller shall authorize and direct and in accordance with this article. Such authorization and direction may provide for the subsequent issuance of replacement notes to refund, upon issuance thereof, such notes, and may specify such other terms and conditions with respect to the notes and replacement notes thereby authorized for issuance as the seller may determine and direct.

When the authorization and direction of the seller provide for the issuance of replacement notes, the seller is hereby authorized in the name and on behalf of the state to enter into agreements with any financial institutions or persons in the United States having the power to enter into the same:

To purchase or underwrite an issue or series of issues of notes.

To enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreements, and to draw monies pursuant to any such agreements on the terms and conditions set forth therein and to issue notes as evidence of borrowings made under any such agreements.

To appoint or act as issuing and paying agent or agents with respect to notes.

To do such other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to provide for the payment, when due, of the principal of and interest on such notes.

Such agreements may provide for the compensation of any purchasers or underwriters of notes or replacement notes by payment of a fixed fee or commission at the time of issuance thereof, and for all other costs and expenses, including fees for agreements related to the notes issuing and paying agent costs. Costs and expenses of issuance may be paid from the proceeds of the notes.

When the authorization and direction of the seller provides for the issuance of replacement notes, it shall, at or prior to the time of delivery of these notes or replacement notes, determine the principal amounts, dates of issue, interest rate or rates, rates of discount, denominations and all other terms and conditions relating to the issuance. The State Treasurer shall perform all acts and things necessary to pay or cause to be paid, when due, all principal of and interest on the notes being refunded by replacement notes and to assure that the same may draw upon any monies available for that purpose pursuant to any purchase loan or credit agreements established with respect thereto, all subject to the authorization and direction of the seller.

Outstanding notes evidencing such borrowings may be funded and retired by the issuance and sale of the bonds of the state as hereinafter authorized. The refunding bonds must be issued and sold not later than a date two (2) years after the date of issuance of the first notes evidencing such borrowings to the extent that payment of such notes has not otherwise been made or provided for by sources other than proceeds of replacement notes.

The proceeds of all such temporary borrowing shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be held and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Section 57-10-521.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 566, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1993).

§ 57-10-531.
Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes and available nonfederal funds.

The proceeds realized from the sale of bonds and notes under this article, other than refunding bonds and replacement notes, shall be paid to the State Treasurer and deposited into the Mississippi Small Business Assistance Fund and specifically dedicated to the purposes enumerated in this article.

All nonfederal funds which may become available for the purposes of this article shall be deposited in the Mississippi Small Business Assistance Fund and shall be allocated for the purposes of this article.

The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds and replacement notes shall be applied solely to the payment of the principal of and the accrued interest on and premium, if any, and costs of redemption of the bonds and notes for which such obligations have been issued.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 566, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1993).

§ 57-10-533.
Attorney General to represent seller in issuing, selling and validating bonds or notes.

Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the seller in issuing, selling and validating bonds or notes herein provided for, and the seller is hereby authorized and empowered to expend from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds or notes authorized hereunder all necessary administrative, legal and other expenses incidental and related to the issuance of bonds or notes authorized under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 566, § 17; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2012.